Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are added  to and made a part of ORS
chapter 90.
SECTION 2. Except as required by a  federal program that provides rent subsidies or af-
fordable rents:
(1) A landlord may not inquire about the immigration or citizenship status of an appli-
cant, a tenant or a member of an applicant’s or a tenant’s household.
(2) If a  landlord requires verification of the identity of an applicant or tenant, the land-
lord shall accept any of the following, or  any combination thereof, necessary to verify an
applicant’s name, date of birth and physical appearance:
(a) A Social Security card or evidence of a Social Security number;
(b) A certified copy of a record of live birth;
(c) A permanent resident card issued by the United  States Citizenship and Immigration
Services;
(d) An immigrant or nonimmigrant visa;
(e) An individual  taxpayer identification number card issued by the Internal Revenue
Service;
(f) A passport, driver license  or other government-issued identification, regardless of
expiration date; or
(g) Any nongovernment identification or combination of identifications  that would permit
a reasonable verification of identity.
(3) A landlord may not discriminate against an applicant, a tenant or a member  of an
applicant’s or a tenant’s household on  the basis of actual or perceived immigration or citi-
zenship status.
SECTION 3.
(1) A landlord may not, with the intent  or purpose of harassing, retaliating
against or intimidating, disclose or threaten to  disclose the immigration or citizenship status
of an applicant, a tenant or a member of an applicant’s or a tenant’s household.
(2) A violation of this section or section 2 of this 2025 Act is:
(a) Considered a violation of ORS 90.390 (1) and subject to ORS 90.390 (2) and (3); and
Enrolled Senate Bill 599 (SB 599-A) Page 1
(b) Only for purposes of ORS 659A.885, considered an unlawful  practice and subject to
remedies under ORS 659A.885.
SECTION 4.  ORS 90.303 is amended to read:
90.303. (1) When evaluating an  applicant, a landlord may not consider a previous action to re-
cover possession pursuant to ORS 105.100 to 105.168 if the action:
(a) Was dismissed or resulted in a general judgment  for the applicant before the applicant sub-
mits the application.
(b) Resulted in a general judgment against the applicant that was:
(A) Entered five or more years before the applicant submits the application; or
(B) Entered on claims that arose on or after April 1, 2020, and before March 1, 2022.
(2) When evaluating the applicant, a landlord may consider a previous arrest of the  applicant
only if the arrest resulted in  charges for criminal conduct as described in subsection (3) of this
section and:
(a) The applicant was convicted of the charges; or
(b) The charges are pending and the applicant  is not presently participating in a diversion,
conditional discharge or deferral of judgment program on the charges.
(3) When evaluating the applicant, the landlord may  consider criminal convictions or pending
charges only for conduct that is presently illegal in this state and is:
(a) A drug-related  crime, but not including convictions based solely on the use or possession of
marijuana;
(b) A person crime;
(c) A sex offense;
(d) A crime involving financial fraud, including identity theft and forgery; or
(e) Any  other crime if the conduct for which the applicant was convicted or charged is of a
nature that would adversely affect:
(A) Property of the landlord or a tenant; or
(B) The health, safety or right to peaceful enjoyment of the premises  of residents, the landlord
or the landlord’s agent.
(4) When evaluating an applicant, a landlord may not consider the possession  of a medical
marijuana card or status as a medical marijuana patient.
(5) When evaluating an applicant, a  landlord may not consider an applicant’s unpaid rent, in-
cluding rent reflected in judgments or referrals of debt to a  collection agency, that accrued on or
after April 1, 2020, and before March 1, 2022.
(6) When evaluating an applicant, a landlord may not:
(a) Inquire about the immigration or citizenship status of an applicant or a  member of
the applicant’s household; or
(b) Reject an application because  an applicant or a member of the applicant’s household
does not produce a Social Security number or prove lawful presence in the  United States,
provided that the applicant agrees to provide identification as provided in  section 2 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 90.303, as amended by section 10, chapter 39, Oregon Laws 2021,  is amended
to read:
90.303. (1) When evaluating an  applicant, a landlord may not consider a previous action to re-
cover possession pursuant to ORS 105.100 to 105.168 if the action:
(a) Was dismissed or resulted in a general judgment  for the applicant before the applicant sub-
mits the application.
(b) Resulted in a general  judgment against the applicant that was entered five or more years
before the applicant submits the application.
(2) When  evaluating the applicant, a landlord may consider a previous arrest of the applicant
only if the arrest resulted in charges for criminal conduct as described  in subsection (3) of this
section and:
(a) The applicant was convicted of the charges; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 599 (SB 599-A) Page 2
(b) The charges are pending and the applicant  is not presently participating in a diversion,
conditional discharge or deferral of judgment program on the charges.
(3) When evaluating the applicant, the  landlord may consider criminal convictions or pending
charges only for conduct that is presently illegal in this state and is:
(a) A drug-related crime, but not including convictions based solely on the use or  possession of
marijuana;
(b) A person crime;
(c) A sex offense;
(d) A crime involving financial fraud, including identity theft and forgery; or
(e) Any other crime if the conduct for which the applicant was convicted or charged is of  a
nature that would adversely affect:
(A) Property of the landlord or a tenant; or
(B) The health, safety or  right to peaceful enjoyment of the premises of residents, the landlord
or the landlord’s agent.
(4) When evaluating an  applicant, a landlord may not consider the possession of a medical
marijuana card or status as a medical marijuana patient.
(5) When evaluating an applicant, a landlord may not:
(a) Inquire about  the immigration or citizenship status of an applicant or a member of
the applicant’s household; or
(b) Reject an application because an applicant or a member  of the applicant’s household
does not produce  a Social Security number or prove lawful presence in the United States,
provided that the applicant agrees  to provide identification as provided in section 2 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act and the  amendments to ORS 90.303 by
section 4 of this 2025 Act become operative 30 days after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 599 (SB 599-A) Page 3